Massachusetts, session 194th, S1549.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:-  
Section 31. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:  
“Disposable menstrual products”, products used by a menstruating individual including, 
but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons and underwear liners.  
“Menstruating individual”, a person who menstruates.   
(b) Any provider of temporary housing assistance, including, but not be limited to, a 
family shelter, a shelter for adults, a hotel used for emergency shelter, an emergency apartment, a 

of 3 10 domestic violence shelter, a runaway and homeless youth shelter or a safe house for refugees, 
shall provide disposable menstrual products at no cost to a menstruating individual. The 
disposable menstrual products shall be available in a convenient manner that does not stigmatize 
the individual seeking such products.   
SECTION 2. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 3 the following section:-  
Section 3A. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-  
“Disposable menstrual products”, products used by a menstruating individual including, 
but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons and underwear liners.  
“Menstruating individual”, a person who menstruates.  
(b) Every primary and secondary school shall provide disposable menstrual products at 
no cost to students. The disposable menstrual products shall be available in a convenient manner 
that does not stigmatize the individual seeking such products, including, but not limited to, in 
restrooms for menstruating individuals.   
SECTION 3. Chapter 127 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:-  
Section 170. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:  
“Administrator”, the keeper of a lock-up facility under chapter 40, the superintendent of a 
correctional facility under chapter 125, a sheriff or special sheriff in charge of a jail, house of 

of 3 31 correction or regional lock-up facility under chapter 126, the colonel of state police and any other 
official who oversees a facility used for the detention of persons arrested and held in custody or 
serving a sentence.  
“Disposable menstrual products”, products used by a menstruating individual including, 
but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons and underwear liners.  
“Menstruating individual”, a person who menstruates.  
(b) The administrator shall provide disposable menstrual products to menstruating 
individuals held or housed in the facility overseen by the administrator at no cost. The disposable 
menstrual products shall be available in a convenient manner that does not stigmatize the 
individual seeking such products.